Hawaii, session 2026, HB948.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 266, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§266-     Customs and security facilities.  (a)  The department of transportation shall construct, maintain, and operate facilities at state commercial harbors for: (1)  Customs inspections, examinations, and clearance operations required under federal law; (2)  Security screening and enforcement operations consistent with federal and state law, including compliance with the federal Maritime Transportation Security Act of 2002, as amended, or any other applicable regulation; and (3)  Any other activity necessary to ensure the safety, security, and lawful operation of commercial harbors. (b)  The department of transportation may enter into agreements or contracts with federal, state, and private entities to carry out the purposes of this section. (c)  The department of transportation may assess and collect fees, charges, or rentals for the use of the customs and security facilities; provided that the revenues shall be deposited into the harbor special fund established under section 266-19 and used exclusively for the purposes of this section. (d)  The department of transportation shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary to carry out the purposes of this section." SECTION 2.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________